District of Columbia statutes.
16-3521

Persons against whom issued; civil action.

A quo warranto may be issued from the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia against —

(1)

a person who within the District of Columbia usurps, intrudes into, or unlawfully holds or exercises, a franchise conferred by the District of Columbia, a public office of the District of Columbia, civil or military, or an office in a domestic corporation; or

(2)

one or more persons who act as a corporation within the District of Columbia without being duly authorized, or exercise within the District of Columbia corporate rights, privileges, or franchises not granted them by law in force in the District of Columbia.

The proceedings shall be deemed a civil action.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Cross References

Superior court jurisdiction, see § 11-921.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-605.01 and § 1-606.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3521.
1973 Ed., § 16-3521.